Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2947.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-16.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-16.1 entitled "Judicial
Selection" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-16.1-4. Criteria for selection of best qualified nominees.
(a) The commission shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors in selecting
the best qualified nominees: intellect, ability, temperament, impartiality, diligence, experience,
maturity, education, publications, and record of public, community, and government service. Every
person shall, at the time of consideration by the commission, be an attorney and licensed to practice
law in the state of Rhode Island and be a current member of the Rhode Island bar association in
good standing.
(b) The commission shall exercise reasonable efforts to encourage racial, ethnic, and
gender diversity within the judiciary of this state. To further this goal, on an annual basis, the
commission shall report to the general assembly and to the governor on (i) the statistics regarding
the race, ethnicity and gender of applicants considered by the commission in the previous year and
(ii) efforts made by the commission during the previous year to encourage racial, ethnic and gender
diversity within the judiciary of this state. The form of the report and the means by which the
commission shall request the necessary information from applicants shall be determined by the
commission pursuant to its rule-making authority, except that no applicant shall be required to
provide the information as a prerequisite to consideration, and the identifying information with
respect to race, ethnicity and gender shall be collected anonymously from applicants. The report

shall be made available to the public. The commission shall also consider the candidate’s sensitivity
to historically disadvantaged classes, and may disqualify any candidate with a demonstrated history
of bias towards any of these classes.
(c) The commission shall establish a standardized merit-based selection process that
includes an initial blind review of applications prior to any interview or public hearing. Identifying
information, including the applicant’s name and any other information reasonably likely to disclose
the applicant’s identity, shall be redacted for purposes of preliminary evaluation. The commission’s
rules shall require that applicants be evaluated according to uniform, job-related criteria adopted in
advance and published on the commission’s website. The rules shall also require structured
evaluation instruments or scoring rubrics sufficient to demonstrate that recommendations are based
on the published merit criteria.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005513
========
LC005513 - Page 2 of 3